Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3202
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Uniform Conflict of Laws Limitations Act:

(1) Claim means a right of action that may be asserted in a civil action or proceeding and includes a right of action created by statute;

(2) State means a state, commonwealth, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, a foreign country, or a political subdivision of any of them; and

(3) Resident means an individual who is domiciled in this state, a corporation that is either incorporated or has its principal place of business in this state, or an unincorporated entity that has its principal place of business in this state.

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 2.